Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5163.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 16-22-32 of the General Laws in Chapter 16-22 entitled "Curriculum
[See Title 16 Chapter 97 — the Rhode Island Board of Education Act]" is hereby amended to read
as follows:
16-22-32. High quality curriculum and materials.
(a)(1) The council on elementary and secondary education (the “council”) shall direct the
commissioner of elementary and secondary education (the “commissioner”) to institute a process
for reviewing and identifying curriculum and materials for mathematics, English language arts, and
science and technology that meet the following requirements:
(i) Is aligned with the academic standards provided in § 16-22-30;
(ii) Is aligned with the curriculum frameworks provided in § 16-22-31;
(iii) Is aligned with the RICAS, or any other test that is adopted as a statewide standardized
test; and
(iv) Is of high quality.
(2) The commissioner shall identify at least five (5) examples each of curricula for
mathematics and English language arts pursuant to this section by no later than January 1, 2021,
for science and technology pursuant to this section by no later than January 1, 2024 31, 2026, and
again as required by the council’s procedures set forth in subsection (a)(8) of this section. Once
identified, the curricula shall be made available to the public, subject to copyright considerations.
(3) The commissioner shall direct all local education agencies (“LEAs”) to select one of

the identified high-quality curricula and materials by the time of their next adoption cycle, but in
any case, no later than June 30, 2023, for mathematics and English language arts, and no later than
June 30, 2025 2026, for science and technology. LEAs shall select curriculum and materials that
are responsive to the LEA’s cultural and linguistic needs, and support culturally responsive
practices. LEAs shall implement the high-quality curricula and materials at the start of the school
year that immediately follows the selection. If an LEA is unable to implement the high-quality
curricula and materials fully due to financial hardship, the commissioner may grant the LEA an
extension of time, provided that the LEA demonstrates continued efforts to complete the
implementation.
(4) The commissioner shall institute a waiver process for LEAs that would like to use a
curriculum other than any identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section. Part of that
process may include, but is not limited to, asking the LEA to:
(i) Develop local curriculum goals;
(ii) Communicate the rationale for selecting the proposed curriculum over any of the
curricula identified by the commissioner; and
(iii) Engage a third-party reviewer that has a proven track record of curriculum audits to
review the proposed curriculum to ensure it aligns with state standards, establishes the scope and
sequence of instruction, is of high quality, is culturally relevant, and to discuss any other strengths
and weaknesses.
(5) Waiver determinations made pursuant to subsection (a)(4) of this section shall be
appealable to the board of education.
(6) Any LEA that has at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its students meeting
expectations on state assessments and also has no student subgroup identified for targeted
assistance under Rhode Island’s accountability process may select and use curricula and materials
other than any identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section for that subject area, only;
provided, however, that if the LEA no longer has at least seventy-five percent (75%) of its students
meeting expectations on state assessments, or if any student subgroup is identified for targeted
assistance under Rhode Island’s accountability process, the LEA must select and implement one of
the curricula identified by the commissioner pursuant to this section.
(7) LEAs shall develop and execute a curriculum implementation plan that includes
professional development to ensure that all teachers and administrators are prepared to implement
the new curriculum with the necessary skill and knowledge.
(8) The council shall develop procedures for updating the identification of curricula and
materials pursuant to this section by no later than September 1, 2021. The procedures shall include
LC000512/SUB A - Page 2 of 4

a requirement that the council review and evaluate the identified curricula and materials regularly
to ensure that the high quality of the curricula and materials is maintained. The review cycle shall
begin in 2025, with subsequent reviews taking place in 2029, 2033, and every four (4) years
thereafter.
(b) On or before December 1, 2020, and annually thereafter on or before December 1, the
commissioner shall report to the governor, president of the senate, and the speaker of the house,
regarding the progress toward fulfilling the requirements of this section, including, but not limited
to, the high-quality curricula and materials identified, selected, and implemented by LEAs pursuant
to this section.
(c) The state shall establish a professional development fund to provide professional
learning to LEAs that elect to use prioritized curricula and materials in mathematics and English
language arts as identified by the commissioner.
(d) For the purposes of this section, “local education agencies” (“LEAs”) shall include all
of the following within the state of Rhode Island:
(1) Public school districts;
(2) Regional school districts;
(3) State-operated schools;
(4) Regional collaborative schools; and
(5) Charter schools.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000512/SUB A
========
LC000512/SUB A - Page 3 of 4